Louisiana, session 2026, HB995.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:440.5(D) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§440.5. Admissibility of videotaped statements; discovery by defendant
* * *
D. Any requirement that a copy of a videotaped statement of a protected
person be provided to a criminal defendant's attorney, to a court, or to any other
person entitled by law to such a copy may be satisfied by providing electronic access
to view the videotaped statement in a manner that is sufficient to protect the rights
of the criminal defendant under the United States Constitution and Louisiana
Constitution. This Subsection does not permit any of the following:
(1) The authorization of a pro se criminal defendant to electronically access
a copy of a videotaped statement of a protected person.
(2) The negation or circumvention of any requirement that a physical copy
of the videotaped statement of a protected person be produced at a criminal trial
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 995 ENROLLED
where a party is introducing the videotaped statement of a protected person as
evidence at the criminal trial.
Section 2. Children's Code Article 327(C) is hereby amended and reenacted and
Children's Code Article 327(D) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
Art. 327. Admissibility
* * *
C. Any requirement that a copy of a videotaped statement of a protected
person be provided to a criminal defendant's attorney, to a court, or to any other
person entitled by law to such a copy may be satisfied by providing electronic access
to view the videotaped statement in a manner that is sufficient to protect the rights
of the criminal defendant under the United States Constitution and Louisiana
Constitution. This Paragraph does not permit any of the following:
(1) The authorization of a pro se criminal defendant to electronically access
a copy of a videotaped statement of a protected person.
(2) The negation or circumvention of any requirement that a physical copy
of the videotaped statement of a protected person be produced at a criminal trial
where a party is introducing the videotaped statement of a protected person as
evidence at the criminal trial.
D. Nothing in this Chapter shall be construed to prohibit the right of
confrontation of a defendant in a criminal proceeding before the court.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.